src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! ============================ !
!! !!!Faroese Noun morphology 
! ============================ !


!    ----------------- !
!! !!!Basic noun lexica 
!    ----------------- !

!! Taken from the dictionary

!! The nominal morphology is added in three layers.
!! In this __first layer__ we add gender tags and morphophonological
!! diacritics.
!! The next two layers are for indefinite and definite
!! suffixes, respectively.


!! !!Lexicons still to be allocated


LEXICON xi ! TOOD: classify xi. They are all m
k1 ;

LEXICON xkv2 ! TOOD: classify xkv1. They are all f and end in a
kv2 ;

LEXICON xh3 ! TOOD: classify xkv2. They are all f and end in a consonant
h3 ;

LEXICON xh25 ! TOOD: classify xkv2. They are all f and end in a consonant
h25 ;

!! !!Irregular nouns

!! These are lexica with number 0, they have no inflectional morphology.

LEXICON k0 
!! @LEXNAME@ for januar etc.
 +N+Msc: irregular_nouns ;

LEXICON kv0 
!! @LEXNAME@ for ommudidd
 +N+Fem: irregular_nouns ;
 
LEXICON h0 ! A-fýra
!! @LEXNAME@ for indeclinable neuters
 +N+Neu: irregular_nouns ;

LEXICON irregular_nouns
!! @LEXNAME@ just gives the tags for the indeclinables
 +Sg+Nom+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Sg+Acc+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Sg+Dat+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Sg+Gen+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar


!! !!Lexica for words belonging to two paradigms.
!! These are simply split (h11/12 to h11 and h12, etc).

LEXICON h11/12 
  h11 ;
  h12  ;

LEXICON h11/41 
  h11 ;
  h41  ;
LEXICON h3/h41 
  h3  ;
  h41 ;
LEXICON h3/kv2
  h3 ;
  kv2 ;
LEXICON h4/41 
  h4  ;
  h41  ;
LEXICON h7/h3 
  h7  ;
  h3  ;
LEXICON k11/kv6 
  k11 ;
  kv6 ; 
LEXICON k19/12 
  k19 ;
  k12  ;
LEXICON k25/17f 
  k25 ;
  k_flt17 ; 
LEXICON k52/kv2 
  k52 ;
  kv2 ; 
LEXICON k9/10 
  k9  ;
  k10  ;
LEXICON k9/16 
  k9  ;
  k16  ;
LEXICON k1/3e
  k1e ;
  k3e ;

LEXICON k1/3
  k1 ;
  k3 ;

LEXICON k1/4
  k1 ;
  k4 ;
LEXICON k1e/48f !k1e/f84b Heini
  k1e     ;
  k_flt48 ;
LEXICON k1e/h24e
 k1e ;
 h24e ;
LEXICON k1/11
 k1 ;
 k11 ;
LEXICON k6/7
               k6          ;
               k7          ;

LEXICON k6/8
               k6          ;
               k8          ;

LEXICON k6e/19e
               k6e         ;
               k19e        ;

LEXICON k7/6
               k7          ;
               k6          ;

LEXICON k8/17
  k8    ;
  k17   ;

LEXICON k8/6
  k8   ;
  k6   ;



!! !!The ordinary lexica
!! These lexica split into sg and pl lexica, and add +N and gender tags.
!! Thereafter it points to Layer 2, the case suffixes


!! !Weak masculines.


LEXICON k1 ! risi
!! __@LEXNAME@__ , risi, is the basic Msc lexicon, split in sg and pl
  k1e    ;
  k_flt1 ;

LEXICON k1e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt1
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc: W_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k1_3stem  
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for 3-syllabic stams like ''felagi'', mixed dative forms + UUML
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGNOM       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGACC       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGDAT_mixed ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGGEN       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLNOM       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLACC       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLDAT       ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML W_M_PLDAT       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLGEN       ;


LEXICON k2 ! beiggi
!! __@LEXNAME@__ beiggi
 +N+Msc:^JI W_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_SGGEN ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k3 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  hagi
  k3e    ;
  k_flt3 ;

LEXICON k3e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt3
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML W_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k4 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  tanki, just pointing to k3 (identical)
  k3 ; ! Same u_umlaut, but nasal cns

LEXICON k5 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for bóndi
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGGEN    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML W_M_PLNOM_UR  ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:^IUML%>rinir MscObl_Flag ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML W_M_PLACC_UR  ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:^IUML%>rinar MscObl_Flag ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLDAT    ; ! bóndum
 +N+Msc:r      W_M_PLDAT    ; ! bóndrum
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLGEN    ;


!! !Strong masculines

LEXICON k6_null 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  antikrist
  k6e_null ;
  k_flt6   ;

LEXICON k6e_null
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN      ;

LEXICON k6 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  úlvur
  k6e    ;
  k_flt6 ;

LEXICON k6e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt6
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k7 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  sandur
  k7e    ;
  k_flt7 ;

LEXICON k7e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;


LEXICON k_flt7
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt8
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl, pointing to k_flt7
  k_flt7 ;

LEXICON k8e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg, pointing to k7e
  k7e   ;

LEXICON k8 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  garður, pointing to k7, but has a different u-umlaut
  k7 ; 

LEXICON k_flt9
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
  k_flt6 ;

LEXICON k9e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg, pointing to k6e
  k6e ;

LEXICON k9
!! __@LEXNAME@__ with double consonant deletion in front of s, but pointing to k6
  k6 ;
  
LEXICON k10/11
  k10 ;
  k11 ;

LEXICON k10
!! __@LEXNAME@__ splitting in sg/pl
  k10e    ;
  k_flt10 ;

LEXICON k10e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt10
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT ; ! Double dative.
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k11/18
               k11      ;
               k18      ;

LEXICON k11 ! ísur
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for ísur
  k11e     ;
  k_flt11  ;


LEXICON k11e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_NULL ;

LEXICON k_flt11
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;



LEXICON k12/6f
         k12      ;
         k_flt6   ;

LEXICON k12 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  vinur
  k12e    ;
  k_flt12 ;

LEXICON k12_bui
!! __@LEXNAME@__ 
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:i MscObl_Flag ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:num MscObl_Flag ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
   k_flt12 ;

LEXICON k12_boe
!! __@LEXNAME@__ 
+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:øur MscNom_Flag ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:ø MscNom_Flag ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:ø MscNom_Flag ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:íggjar MscNom_Flag ;

LEXICON k12e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt12
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k13e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg, giving extra NULL dative then pointing to k12e
         k12e           ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;

LEXICON k13 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  vegur
         k12            ; !! As k12, plus a zero dative
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;

LEXICON k14 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  staður
  k14e    ;
  k_flt14 ;

LEXICON k14e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;

LEXICON k_flt14
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;
