src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns 
fit+CmpNP/None:fit xkv2 ;
not+CmpNP/None:not xkv2 ;
pló+CmpNP/None:pló xkv2 ;
vei+CmpNP/None:ve xh25 ;
jói+CmpNP/None:jó xi ;
LEXICON Nouns
boripallur:bori#pall k10 ;
skjúrtuknappur:skjúrtu#knapp k10 ;
stimaknappar:stima#knapp k_flt10 ;
tvíknappar:tví#knapp k_flt10 ;
krók-o:krók-o h0 ;
juni:juni k0 ;
januar:januar k0 ;
novembur:novembur k0 ;
bíbil:bíbil kv0 ;
maskin:maskin kv0 ;
rumbuldós:rumbuldós kv0 ;
klubbi:klubb k1/11 ;
snapsur:snaps k11 ;
sótheysur:sótheys k11 ;
stoff:stoff h11/41 ;
farvustoff:farvustoff h11/41 ;
koldepot:koldepot h11/41 ;
marked:marked h4/41 ;
lasarett:lasarett h4/41 ;
maskingever:maskingever h3/h41 ;
prostata:prostat h0 ;
nýrnabruni:nýrnabrun k1 ;
íslandsrennari:íslandsrennar k1 ;
munnpengar:munn#peng k_flt1 ;
dúnkarkar:dúnkark k_flt1 ;
slíðrar:slíðr k_flt1 ;
svágur:svág k19/12 ;
loynikeypskapur:loyni#keyp#skap k12 ;
átrúnaður:átrúnað k12 ;
stórbýur:stór#bý k12_bui ;
landkostir:landkost k_flt12 ;
móðurlutir:móðurlut k_flt12 ;
abbabeiggi:abbabeiggj k2 ;
fjaðraskíggi:fjaðraskíggj k2 ;
ordan:ordan k52/kv2 ;
fransiskanaraordan:fransiskanaraordan k52/kv2 ;
keksabakki:keksa#bakk k1/3 ;
trøllhali:trøllhal k1/3 ;
matkassi:matkass k1/3 ;
afturvegur:aftur#veg k13 ;
navnasiður:navna#sið k13 ;
krógvispæl:krógvi#spæl h7/h3 ;
gonguspæl:gongu#spæl h7/h3 ;
gulløl:gull#øl h3/kv2 ;
hveitiøl:hveiti#øl h3/kv2 ;
koffein:koffein xh3 ;
veðurlagsgass:veður#lags#gass h11/12 ;
vakstrarhúsgass:vakstrar#hús#gass h11/12 ;
jarðgass:jarð#gass h11/12 ;
hentisalat:henti#salat h3/kv2 ;
harmljóð:harmljóð xh3 ;
ervahagi:ervahag k3 ;
summarhagi:summarhag k3 ;
undirkarði:undirkarð k3 ;
fínkarðar:fínkarð k_flt3 ;
blandingarkarðar:blandingarkarð k_flt3 ;
grovkarðar:grovkarð k_flt3 ;
strangi:strang k1/4 ;
áraplanki:áraplank k1/4 ;
maskinverkstaður:maskin#verk#stað k14 ;
virkisstaður:virkis#stað k14 ;
fingrastaðir:fingra#stað k_flt14 ;
hóreiggj:hóreiggj xh3 ;
skilatanki:skilatank k4 ;
baktanki:baktank k4 ;
fagnarbóndi:fagnarbónd k5 ;
óðalsbóndi:óðalsbónd k5 ;
andstøðingur:andstøðing k6 ;
seglbátur:seglbát k6 ;
júkungar:júkung k_flt6 ;
terrakvistar:terrakvist k_flt6 ;
anbefalingur:anbefaling k11/kv6 ;
mórenusandur:mórenusand k7 ;
sólgarður:sólgarð k8 ;
leysapartar:leysapart k_flt8 ;
tollur:toll k9 ;
naglasoppur:naglasopp k9 ;
hálvsokkar:hálvsokk k_flt9 ;
skáldkoppar:skáldkopp k_flt9 ;
kvinnutokki:kvinnutokk k1e ;
trúni:trún k1e/h24e ;
góðtrúni:góð#trún k1e/h24e ;
bjarnterri:bjarnterr k1e ;
ódagi:ódag k1/3e ;
snjógvhagi:snjógvhag k3e ;
mistrúni:mis#trún k1e/h24e ;
fortreð:fortreð h0 ;
moralur:moral k8e ;
tíðindaetikkur:tíðindaetikk k9e ;
teigabøur:teiga#bø k12_bui ;
kjølur:kjøl k25/17f ;
hamari:hamar k1e/48f ;
klinkhamari:klinkhamar k1e/48f ;
gróthamari:gróthamar k1e/48f ;
Skagi:Skag k3e ;
kleggi:klegg k2 ;
kølitangi:køli#tang k1/4 ;
hanabjálki:hana#bjálk k1 ;
illtanki:ill#tank k4 ;
kult:kult k6_null ;
antikrist:antikrist k6_null ;
felagi:felag k1_3stem ;
búfelagi:búfelag k1_3stem ;
gullbrandur:gullbrand k7/6 ;
nykubrandur:nykubrand k7/6 ;
sjósandur:sjósand k7 ;
ísturbjølgur:ísturbjølg k12/6f ;
drangur:drang k7/6 ;
ruddingur:rudding k6e ;
oyðiskógur:oyðiskóg k12/6f ;
blakkur:blakk k9/10 ;
endanekkur:endanekk k9e ;
kjálkabøkkur:kjálkabøkk k9/16 ;
hvannabøkkur:hvannabøkk k9/16 ;
loynibøkkur:loynibøkk k9/16 ;
fjalladalur:fjalladal k8/17 ;
áardalur:áardal k8/17 ;
rivudalur:rivudal k8/17 ;
sallur:sall k10e ;
válur:vál k6e ;
skammur:skamm k10e ;
kynbarmur:kynbarm k8/6 ;
baktarmur:baktarm k6/8 ;
eygnahvarmur:eygnahvarm k8/6 ;
húgvuravnur:húgvuravn k6/8 ;
hanakampur:hana#kamp k6/7 ;
trøllakalskampur:trølla#kals#kamp k6/7 ;
svampur:svamp k6/7 ;
presur:pres k11e ;
ovuransur:ovurans k11e ;
kassur:kass k10/11 ;
mókassur:mókass k10/11 ;
handarkossur:handar#koss k11/18 ;
fingurkossur:fingur#koss k11/18 ;
kellingarkjaftur:kellingar#kjaft k6/8 ;
svøltur:svølt k6e/19e ;
pústur:púst k6e/19e ;
nevapústur:neva#púst k6e/19e ;
sáðugreytur:sáðu#greyt k12e ;
skarvur:skarv k8/6 ;
ófriður:ó#frið k13e ;
griður:grið k13e ;
kistuviður:kistu#við k12e ;
geilargarður:geilar#garð k8 ;
lampuosi:lampu#os k1e ;
